Utah statutes.
20A-8-404.    Facilities for political conventions and other political
activities.
(1)  The legislative bodies of counties, municipalities, and school districts
may make meeting facilities available to registered political parties, without
discrimination, to be used for political party activities.
(2)  If a legislative body chooses to make meeting facilities available, it
may establish terms and conditions for use of those facilities.
